Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-139
Unauthorized use; liability.

Subject to section 87-143, any person who (1) uses, without the consent of the registrant, any reproduction, counterfeit, copy, or colorable imitation of a mark registered under the Trademark Registration Act in connection with the sale, distribution, offering for sale, or advertising of any goods or services on or in connection with which such use is likely to cause confusion or mistake or to deceive as to the source of origin of such goods or services or (2) reproduces, counterfeits, copies, or colorably imitates any such mark and applies such reproduction, counterfeit, copy, or colorable imitation to labels, signs, prints, packages, wrappers, receptacles, or advertisements intended to be used upon or in connection with the sale or other distribution in this state of such goods or services, is liable in a civil action by the registrant for any and all of the remedies provided in section 87-141, except that under subdivision (2) of this section, the registrant is not entitled to recover profits or damages unless the acts have been committed with the intent to cause confusion or mistake or to deceive.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 14.